District of Columbia statutes.
29-1005.02

Becoming member.

(a)

If a limited cooperative association is to have only one cooperative member upon formation, the cooperative becomes a member as agreed by that cooperative and the organizer of the limited cooperative association. That cooperative and the organizer may be, but need not be, different persons. If different, the organizer acts on behalf of the initial cooperative member.

(b)

If a limited cooperative association is to have more than one member upon formation, those persons become members as agreed by the persons before the formation of the limited cooperative association. The organizer acts on behalf of the persons in forming the limited cooperative association and may be, but need not be, one of the persons.

(c)

After formation of a limited cooperative association, a person becomes a member:

(1)

As provided in the organic rules;

(2)

As the result of a transaction effective under subchapter XV of this chapter or Chapter 2 of this title;

(3)

With the consent of all the members; or

(4)

As provided in § 29-1012.02(3).

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(j)(4)(A), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 502 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.